Missouri, session 2026, HB1894.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 376.1583, to read as follows:
376.1583. 1. The provisions of this section shall be known and may be cited as
the "Patients First Act".
2. The department of commerce and insurance shall implement and enforce the
nondiscrimination protections in Section 2706 of the federal Public Health Service Act,
42 U.S.C. Section 300gg-5, by ensuring that no group health plan or health insurance
issuer offering group or individual health insurance coverage shall discriminate with
respect to participation under the plan or coverage against any health care provider
who is acting within the scope of that provider's license or certification under state law.
3. (1) A health benefit plan, as defined in section 376.1350, shall not discriminate
against a health care provider based on the provider's licensure with respect to
reimbursement or participation in any plan or insurance program.
(2) All health care providers shall be reimbursed at the same rate for the same
service as long as such service is within the provider's scope of practice under state law.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a group health plan or a
health insurance issuer from establishing varying reimbursement rates based on quality
or performance measures.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a group health plan or
health insurance issuer to accept any willing provider into a network.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 1894 2
4. Nothing in this section shall apply to physicians licensed under chapter 334.
5. The department of commerce and insurance may promulgate all necessary
rules and regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and
chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔